Hawaii, session 2026, HB267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training and access to automated external defibrillators (AEDs) are essential to school safety at sporting events.  Thirty-one states across the nation require coaches receive CPR training.  Unfortunately, Hawaii is not one of them.  Seventy per cent of students who experience cardiac arrest in a school with an AED survive.  This is a significant increase from the average rate of survival.  Every minute that passes without AED intervention decreases the survival rate by ten per cent.  Further, schools should be equipped with other lifesaving measures such as Narcan, EpiPens, and inhalers. The purpose of this Act is to mandate that: (1)  Each sporting event of 25 or more participants have a CPR trained coach or athletic trainer in attendance; and (2)  All schools be equipped with AED devices, Narcan, EpiPens, and inhalers. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A‑ Life-saving measures; CPR; requirements; training. (a)  By the end of the 2025-2026 school year: (1)  All public schools shall have a minimum of two automated external defibrillators: (A)  One to be situated in a permanent location on campus; and (B)  One to be utilized for organized sporting events of 25 or more participants; (2)  All public schools shall be equipped with Narcan, EpiPens, and inhalers; (3)  All public schools that have an athletic trainer shall ensure that at every sporting event of 25 or more participants, an additional automated external defibrillator is available, and the athletic trainer is trained and certified at all times in the use of automated external defibrillators; and (4)  All public schools that do not have an athletic trainer shall ensure that at every sporting event of 25 or more participants, at all times at least two faculty members of the school in attendance are trained and certified in the use of automated external defibrillators. (b)  The department shall ensure that the automated external defibrillators are: (1)  Maintained and regularly tested according to the operation and maintenance guidelines set forth by the manufacturer; and (2)  Checked for readiness after each use and at least once every thirty days if the automated external defibrillator has not been used in the preceding thirty days; provided that records of the checks shall be maintained by the department and the individual school. (c)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall offer a mandatory CPR training for athletic trainers and coaches at the beginning of each academic year. (d)  For purposes of this section, "sporting event" includes competitions, scrimmages, and practices." SECTION 3.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D‑    Life-saving measures; CPR; requirements; training. (a)  By the end of the 2025-2026 school year: (1)  All charter schools shall have a minimum of two automated external defibrillators: (A)  One to be situated in a permanent location on campus; and (B)  One to be utilized for organized sporting events of 25 or more participants; (2)  All charter schools shall be equipped with Narcan, EpiPens, and inhalers; (3)  All charter schools that have an athletic trainer shall ensure that at every sporting event of 25 or more participants, an additional automated external defibrillator is available and the athletic trainer is trained and certified at all times in the use of automated external defibrillators; and (4)  All charter schools that do not have an athletic trainer shall ensure that at every sporting event of 25 or more participants, at all times at least two faculty members of the charter school in attendance are trained and certified in the use of automated external defibrillators. (b)  Each charter school shall ensure that the automated external defibrillators are: (1)  Maintained and regularly tested according to the operation and maintenance guidelines set forth by the manufacturer; and (2)  Checked for readiness after each use and at least once every thirty days if the automated external defibrillator has not been used in the preceding thirty days; provided that records of the checks shall be maintained by the charter school. (c)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the school shall offer a mandatory CPR training for athletic trainers and coaches at the beginning of each academic year. (d)  For purposes of this section, "sporting event" includes competitions, scrimmages, and practices." SECTION 4.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A‑    Life-saving measures; requirements; training.  (a)  By the end of the 2025-2026 school year: (1)  All divisions and campuses of the University of Hawaii system shall have an automated external defibrillator situated in a permanent location on campus; and (2)  The athletic department of the University of Hawaii, with regard to each institution under the University of Hawaii system, shall ensure that: (A)  There is an automated external defibrillator available to the athletic trainer present at every sporting event of 25 or more participants; and (B)  At all times, every athletic trainer is trained and certified in the use of automated external defibrillators; and (3)  All divisions and campuses of the University of Hawaii system shall be equipped with Narcan, EpiPens, and inhalers. (b)  The University of Hawaii and each institution under the University of Hawaii system shall ensure that the automated external defibrillator is: (1)  Maintained and regularly tested according to the operation and maintenance guidelines set forth by the manufacturer; and (2)  Checked for readiness after each use and at least once every thirty days if the automated external defibrillator has not been used in the preceding thirty days; provided that records of the checks shall be maintained by the University of Hawaii. (c)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the University of Hawaii shall offer a mandatory CPR training for athletic trainers and coaches at the beginning of each academic year. (d)  For purposes of this section, "sporting event" includes competitions, scrimmages, and practices." SECTION 5.  Section 663-1.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  Any person who in good faith, without remuneration or expectation of remuneration, attempts to resuscitate a person in immediate danger of loss of life when administering any automated external defibrillator, regardless of where the automated external defibrillator that is used is located, shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission except as may result from the person's gross negligence or wanton acts or omissions[.]; provided that an athletic trainer or faculty member who administers an automated external defibrillator, Narcan, EpiPen, or inhaler pursuant to section 302A- , 302-D  , or 304A‑  , shall be considered to be doing so without remuneration or expectation of remuneration. Any person, including an employer, who provides for an automated external defibrillator or an automated external defibrillator training program shall not be vicariously liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission of the persons or employees who, in good faith and without remuneration or the expectation of remuneration, attempt to resuscitate a person in immediate danger of loss of life by administering an automated external defibrillator, except as may result from a person's or employer's gross negligence or wanton acts or omissions." SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $        or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purchase of automated external defibrillators, Narcan, EpiPens, inhalers, and mandatory CPR training. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $        or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purchase of automated external defibrillators, Narcan, EpiPens, inhalers, and mandatory CPR training. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the charter school administrative office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 8.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________